Nebraska, session 109, LB537.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB537 LB537
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 81-407, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-407 (1) The Workforce Development Program Cash Fund is hereby
created. The fund shall consist of transfers authorized by the
Legislature.
(2) The Department of Labor shall administer the fund to provide
workforce development grants. The department shall award grants evenly
between the three congressional districts. A workforce development grant
shall be used for developing job skills, money management, communication
skills, job preparation, and job placement. To be eligible for a grant,
an applicant shall demonstrate the availability of one-to-one matching
from private funds. A grant recipient shall report to the department
regarding job placement and self-sufficiency development of individuals
receiving such services.
(3) Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested
by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(4) It is the intent of the Legislature to transfer one million five
hundred thousand dollars from the General Fund to the Workforce
Development Program Cash Fund for fiscal year 2025-26 in order for the
department to provide workforce development grants.
Sec. 2. Original section 81-407, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-2-